Illinois, session 104th, SB3128.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 527-23.19 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-23.19 new)7    Sec. 27-23.19. Firearm safety training course.8    (a) In this Section, "firearm" and "firearm ammunition" 9have the meanings given to those terms under Section 1.1 of the 10Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 11    (b) A school district may offer a firearm safety training 12course to students in grades 9 through 12, which may include 13instruction on hunting safety. If a school district offers the 14course, a student may not be required to take the course. Any 15firearm that is operable or any firearm ammunition that is 16live may not be present during the course instruction. 17    (c) If a school board intends to offer a firearm safety 18training course under this Section, it must develop a policy 19to implement the course and must publish that policy on the 20district's website.